Rhode Island, session 2025, SB506.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-27.3-109.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled "State
Building Code" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-109.1. Committee’s rule making authority — Legislative report — Legislative
committee.
(a) The committee is empowered to adopt codes and standards, subject to approval pursuant
to subsection (c), which shall, in general, conform with nationally reorganized model building
codes, model 1 and 2 family dwelling codes, model plumbing codes, model mechanical codes,
model electrical codes, model energy codes, model property maintenance codes, accessibility for
persons with disabilities standards, and other such technical provisions of codes and standards
developed to ensure the general public’s health, safety, and welfare.
(b) Annually the committee shall submit a report to the general assembly on the codes and
standards so adopted and shall provide the following information:
(1) Proposed amendments to the model codes and standards and supporting statement
therefor.
(2)(i) A summary of testimony received at public hearings held by the committee, on
adoption of the codes and standards.
(ii) The committee, subject to approval pursuant to subsection (c), shall adopt the codes
and standards in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

(iii) The provisions of the state building code, so adopted, subject to approval pursuant to
subsection (c), shall have the force and effect of law upon review and approval of the legislative
regulation committee.
(c)(1) There shall be established a legislative regulation committee that shall review,
approve, or reject, in total or in part, the state building code regulations proposed by the building
code standards committee prior to their being filed with the secretary of state.
(2) The legislative regulation committee shall be comprised of four (4) members of the
house of representatives, not more than three (3) from one political party, appointed by the speaker
of the house of representatives; and three (3) members of the senate, not more than two (2) from
one political party, appointed by the president of the senate.
(3) The committee shall elect from among its members a chairperson and vice chairperson.
(4) Regulations submitted to the committee shall be acted upon within sixty (60) days from
the date the regulations are submitted to them by the executive secretary of the building code
standards committee.
(5) A majority vote of the committee’s members present shall decide all votes. A quorum
shall consist of a simple majority.
(6) Members shall retain membership on the committee until replaced by the respective
appointing authority or until they are not members of the house from which they were appointed.
(7) The state building commissioner and staff shall assist the committee in its
administrative duties and in scheduling meetings. The commissioner shall inform the committee of
all proposed regulations prior to submission.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001527
========
LC001527 - Page 2 of 3